Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.035, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. School district and charter school policy. (a) A school board and a charter school must adopt a crisis management policy to address potential violent crisis situations in the district or charter school. The policy must be developed cooperatively with administrators, teachers, employees, students, parents, community members, law enforcement agencies, other emergency management officials, county attorney offices, social service agencies, emergency medical responders, and any other appropriate individuals or organizations. The policy must include at least five school lock-down drills, five school fire drills consistent with section 299F.30, and one tornado drill.new text begin The policy must provide for the unique needs of students with mobility restrictions, sensory needs, developmental or physical disabilities, mental health needs, and auditory or visual limitations in crisis situations.new text end (b) A school board or a charter school may adopt the model cardiac emergency response plan provided by the commissioner under subdivision 1.